Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 2 Composition of House of Representatives

22-2-1.
Composition of house of representatives.

Commencing on the first Tuesday in January, 2023, the house of representatives shall consist of seventy-five (75) members, one representative being elected from each of the representative districts into which the state is divided in §

22-2-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 5, § 7, effective February 16, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 6, § 7, effective February 16, 2022.